Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 3. Small Employer Health Insurance Availability

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of provider of health or medical services, as assignee of claim under ERISA (Employment Retirement Income Security Act of 1974), to maintain action against plan payor, 133 ALR Fed 109.

Construction and application of Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq.) by United States Supreme Court, 150 ALR Fed 441.

§ 26-19-301.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Small Employer Health Insurance Availability Act.”

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 58, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” as used in this section, see
§ 26-19-302(a)(xxviii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction of incontestable clause applicable to disability insurance, 67 ALR5th 513.

§ 26-19-302.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Actuarial certification” means a written statement by a member of the American Academy of Actuaries or other individual acceptable to the commissioner that a small employer carrier is in compliance with the provisions of W.S.

26-19-304

, based upon the person’s examination, including a review of the appropriate records and of the actuarial assumptions and methods used by the small employer carrier in establishing premium rates for applicable health benefit plans;

“Base premium rate” means, for each class of business as to a rating period, the lowest premium rate charged or that could have been charged under a rating system for that class of business, by the small employer carrier to small employers with similar case characteristics for health benefit plans with the same or similar coverage;

“Basic health benefit plan” means a low cost health benefit plan developed pursuant to W.S.

26-19-308

;

“Board” means the board of directors of the program;

“Carrier” means any person who provides any health benefit plan in this state subject to state insurance regulation and includes, but is not limited to, an insurance company, a fraternal benefit society, a prepaid hospital or medical care plan, a health maintenance organization and a multiple employer welfare arrangement. For purposes of this act, companies that are affiliated companies or that are eligible to file a consolidated tax return shall be treated as one (1) carrier except that any insurance company, health service corporation, hospital service corporation or medical service corporation that is an affiliate of a health maintenance organization located in this state, or any health maintenance organization located in this state which is an affiliate of an insurance company, health service corporation, hospital service corporation or medical service corporation may treat the health maintenance organization as a separate carrier and each health maintenance organization that operates only one (1) health maintenance organization in an established geographic service area of this state may be considered a separate carrier;

“Case characteristics” means demographic or other objective characteristics of a small employer, as determined by a small employer carrier, that are considered by the small employer carrier in the determination of premium rates for the small employer, provided, however, that claim experience, health status and duration of coverage since issue are not case characteristics for the purposes of this act;

“Class of business” means all of a distinct grouping of small employers as shown on the records of the small employer carrier, and provided:

A distinct grouping may only be established by the small employer carrier on the basis that the applicable health benefit plans:

Are marketed and sold through individuals and organizations which are not participating in the marketing or sale of other distinct groupings of small employers for such small employer carrier;

Have been acquired from another small employer carrier as a distinct grouping of plans; or

Are provided through an association with membership of not less than two (2) small employers.

A small employer carrier may establish no more than two (2) additional groupings under each subdivision (I) through (III) of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph on the basis of underwriting criteria which are expected to produce substantial variation in the health care costs;

The commissioner may approve the establishment of additional distinct groupings upon application to the commissioner and a finding by the commissioner that such action would enhance the efficiency and fairness of the small employer marketplace.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 94, § 3.

“Dependent” means:

A spouse or unmarried child under the age of nineteen (19) years;

An unmarried child who is a full-time student under the age of twenty-three (23);

A child of any age who is disabled and dependent upon the parent;

Any other individual defined to be a dependent in the health benefit plan covering the employee.

“Eligible employee” means an employee who works on a full-time basis, with a normal work week of thirty (30) or more hours and has met any applicable waiting period requirements. The term includes a sole proprietor, a partner of a partnership or an independent contractor, if the sole proprietor, partner or independent contractor is included as an employee under a health benefit plan of a small employer, but does not include employees who work on a part-time, temporary, seasonal or substitute basis;

“Established geographic service area” means a geographical area approved by the commissioner in conjunction with the carrier’s certificate of authority to transact insurance in this state, within which the carrier is authorized to provide coverage;

“Health benefit plan” means any hospital or medical policy or certificate, major medical expense insurance, hospital or medical service plan contract or health maintenance organization subscriber contract. “Health benefit plan” does not include accident-only, credit, dental, vision, Medicare supplement, long-term care or disability income insurance, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, worker’s compensation or similar insurance or automobile medical-payment insurance, nor does it include policies or certificates of specified disease, hospital confinement indemnity or limited benefit health insurance if the carrier offering the policies or certificates certifies to the commissioner that policies or certificates described in this paragraph are being offered and marketed as supplemental health insurance and not as a substitute for hospital or medical expense insurance or major medical expense insurance;

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 83, § 2.

“Index rate” means, for each class of business as to a rating period for small employers with similar case characteristics, the arithmetic average of the applicable base premium rate and the corresponding highest premium rate;

“Late enrollee” means an eligible employee or dependent who requests enrollment in a health benefit plan of a small employer following the initial enrollment period provided under the terms of the health benefit plan, provided that the initial enrollment period shall be a period of at least thirty (30) days. An eligible employee or dependent shall not be considered a late enrollee if:

The individual:

Was covered under a public or private health insurance or other health benefit arrangement at the time the individual was eligible to enroll;

Has lost coverage under a public or private health insurance or other health benefit arrangement as a result of termination of employment or eligibility, the termination of the other plan’s coverage, death of a spouse, divorce, legal separation or termination of employer contribution; and

Requests enrollment within thirty (30) days after termination of coverage provided under a public or private health insurance or other health benefit arrangement.

The individual is employed by an employer which offers multiple health benefit plans and the individual elects a different plan during an open enrollment period; or

A court has ordered coverage be provided for a spouse or minor child under a covered employee’s health benefit plan and request for enrollment is made within thirty (30) days after issuance of the court order.

“New business premium rate” means, for each class of business as to a rating period, the lowest premium rate charged or offered, or which could have been charged or offered, by the small employer carrier to small employers with similar case characteristics for newly issued health benefit plans with the same or similar coverage;

“Participating carrier” means all small employer carriers issuing health benefit plans in this state. “Participating carrier” shall also include any carrier that maintains an existing health benefit plan covering eligible employees of one (1) or more small employers;

“Plan of operation” means the plan of operation of the program, including articles, bylaws and operating rules adopted by the board pursuant to W.S.

26-19-307

;

“Preexisting condition provision” means a policy provision that excludes coverage for charges or expenses incurred during a specified period following the insured’s effective date of coverage, as to a condition which, during a specified period immediately preceding the effective date of coverage, medical advice, diagnosis, care or treatment was recommended or received;

“Program” means the Wyoming small employer health reinsurance program created by W.S.

26-19-307

;

“Rating period” means the calendar period for which premium rates established by a small employer carrier are assumed to be in effect, as determined by the small employer carrier;

“Small employer” means any person, firm, corporation, partnership or association who is actively engaged in business who, on at least fifty percent (50%) of its working days during the preceding calendar quarter, employed at least two (2) but no more than fifty (50) eligible employees, the majority of whom were employed within this state or were residents of Wyoming. In determining the number of eligible employees, companies which are affiliated companies, or which are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of any state taxation, shall be considered one (1) employer;

“Small employer carrier” means any carrier that offers health benefit plans covering eligible employees of one (1) or more small employers;

“Standard health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan developed pursuant to W.S.

26-19-308

;

“Taft-Hartley trust” means a trust formed pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement under the federal Labor Management Relations Act of 1947;

“Affiliation period” means a period which, under the terms of the health insurance coverage offered by a health maintenance organization, must expire before the health insurance coverage becomes effective. The health maintenance organization is not required to provide health care services or benefits during an affiliation period and no premiums shall be charged to the participant or beneficiary for any coverage during the period;

“Provider network” means health insurance coverage offered by a health insurance issuer under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care, is provided in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the issuer;

“This act” means W.S.

26-19-301

through

26-19-310

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 58, § 1; 1993, ch. 83, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 93, § 2; ch. 94, § 3; 1997, ch. 120, § 1; 2003, ch. 160, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

As to federal Medicare, referred to in subsection (a)(xii), see 42 USCS § 1395 et seq.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-19-303.
Applicability and scope.

This act shall apply to any health benefit plan which provides coverage to two (2) or more employees of a small employer in this state if:

Any portion of the premium or benefits is paid by a small employer or if an eligible employee or dependent is reimbursed, whether through wage adjustments or otherwise, by a small employer for any portion of the premium; or

The health benefit plan is treated by the employer or any of the eligible employees or dependents as part of a plan or program for the purposes of section 162 [26 U.S.C. § 162], section 125 [26 U.S.C. § 125] or section 106 [26 U.S.C. § 106] existing as of the effective date of this act or similar sections subsequently enacted of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, W.S. 26-19-305(a) and (c) and 26-19-304(a) shall not apply to individual health benefit policies sold to small employers which are subject to approval for policy form by the commissioner.

A Taft-Hartley trust, or a carrier with the written authorization of a Taft-Hartley trust may make a written request to the commissioner for a waiver from the application of any of the provisions of W.S. 26-19-304(a) with respect to a health benefit plan provided to the trust. The commissioner may grant the waiver if he finds that application of W.S. 26-19-304(a) with respect to the trust would have a substantial adverse effect on the participants and beneficiaries of the trust, and would require significant modifications to one (1) or more collectively bargained arrangement for which the trust is established or maintained. A waiver granted under this subsection shall not apply to an individual if the person participates in the trust as an associate member of an employee organization.

This act shall apply to multiple employer welfare arrangements, consistent with W.S.

26-19-115

.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 58, § 1; 1993, ch. 83, § 1; 2019 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (d).

Applicability

Laws 2019, ch. 99 § 3, provides: "This act applies to health insurance policies issued on or after July 1, 2019."

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

26-19-301

.

§ 26-19-304.
Restrictions relating to premium rates.

Premium rates for health benefit plans subject to this act shall be subject to the following provisions:

The index rate for a rating period for any class of business shall not exceed the index rate for any other class of business by more than twenty percent (20%);

For a class of business, the premium rates charged during a rating period to small employers with similar case characteristics for the same or similar coverage, or the rates which could be charged to employers under the rating system for that class of business shall not vary from the index rate by more than thirty-five percent (35%) of the index rate;

The percentage increase in the premium rate charged to a small employer for a new rating period shall not exceed the sum of the following:

The percentage change in the new business premium rate measured from the first day of the prior rating period to the first day of the new rating period. In the case of a health benefit plan into which a small employer carrier is no longer enrolling new small employers, the carrier shall use the percentage change in the base premium rate, provided that the change does not exceed, on a percentage basis, the change in the new business premium rate for the most similar health benefit plan into which the carrier is actively enrolling new small employers;

Any adjustment, not to exceed fifteen percent (15%) annually and adjusted pro rata for rating periods of less than one (1) year, due to the claim experience, health status or duration of coverage of the employees or dependents of the small employer as determined from the small employer carrier’s rate manual for the class of business; and

Any adjustment due to change in coverage or change in the case characteristics of the small employer as determined from the small employer carrier’s rate manual for the class of business.

Adjustments in rates for claims experience, health status and duration from issue shall not be charged to individual employees or dependents. Any such adjustment shall be applied uniformly to the rates charged for all employees and dependents of the small employer;

Any adjustment in rates charged by a small employer carrier caused by reinsurance is subject to the rating limitations set forth in this section;

Premium rates for health benefit plans shall comply with the requirements of this section notwithstanding any assessments paid or payable by small employer carriers under this act;

In any case where a small employer carrier utilizes industry as a case characteristic in establishing premium rates, the rate factor associated with any industry classification shall not vary from the arithmetic average of the rate factors associated with all industry classifications by greater than fifteen percent (15%) of such coverage;

In the case of health benefit plans issued prior to the effective date of this act, a premium rate for a rating period may exceed the ranges set forth in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of subsection (a) of this section for a period of three (3) years following the effective date of this act. In such case, the percentage increase in the premium rate charged to a small employer in such a class of business for a new rating period may not exceed the sum of the following:

The percentage change in the new business premium rate measured from the first day of the prior rating period to the first day of the new rating period. In the case of a health benefit plan into which a small employer carrier is no longer enrolling new small employers, the carrier shall use the percentage change in the base premium rate, provided that the change does not exceed, on a percentage basis, the change in the new business premium rate for the most similar health benefit plan into which the carrier is actively enrolling new small employers; and

Any adjustment due to change in coverage or change in the case characteristics of the small employer as determined from the carrier’s rate manual for the class of business.

Small employer carriers shall apply rating factors, including case characteristics, consistently with respect to all small employers in a class of business;

For the purposes of this subsection, a health benefit plan that utilizes a provider network shall not be considered similar coverage to a health benefit plan that does not utilize such a network, provided that utilization of the network results in substantial differences in claims costs;

The small employer carrier shall not use case characteristics, other than age, gender, industry, geographic area, family composition and group size without prior approval of the commissioner;

The commissioner shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section and to assure that rating practices used by small employer carriers are consistent with the purposes of this act, including regulations that:

Assure that differences in rates charged for health benefit plans by small employer carriers are reasonable and reflect objective differences in plan design;

Prescribe the manner in which case characteristics may be used by small employer carriers.

A small employer carrier shall not transfer a small employer involuntarily into or out of a class of business. A small employer carrier shall not offer to transfer a small employer into or out of a class of business unless the offer is made to transfer all small employers in the class of business without regard to case characteristics, claim experience, health status or duration of coverage since issue.

The commissioner may suspend for a specified period the application of paragraph (a)(i) of this section as to the premium rates applicable to one (1) or more small employers included within a class of business of a small employer carrier for one (1) or more rating periods upon a filing by the small employer carrier and a finding by the commissioner either that the suspension is reasonable in light of financial condition of the small employer carrier or that the suspension would enhance the efficiency and fairness of the marketplace for small employer health insurance.

In connection with the offering for sale of any health benefit plan to a small employer, the small employer carrier shall make a reasonable disclosure, as part of its solicitation and sales materials, of the following:

The extent to which premium rates for a specified small employer are established or adjusted in part based upon the actual or expected variation in claims costs or actual or expected variation in health condition of the employees and dependents of the small employer;

The provisions concerning the small employer carrier’s right to change premium rates and the factors other than claim experience which affect changes in premium rates;

The provisions relating to renewability of policies and contracts; and

The provisions relating to any preexisting condition provision.

Each small employer carrier shall:

Maintain at its principal place of business a complete and detailed description of its rating practices and renewal underwriting practices, including information and documentation that demonstrate that its rating methods and practices are based upon commonly accepted actuarial assumptions and are in accordance with sound actuarial principles;

File with the commissioner annually on or before March 15 an actuarial certification certifying that the carrier is in compliance with this act and that the rating methods of the small employer carrier are actuarially sound. A copy of the certification shall be retained by the small employer carrier at its principal place of business;

Make the information and documentation described in paragraph (i) of this subsection available to the commissioner upon request. Except in cases of violations of this act, the information shall be considered proprietary and trade secret information and shall not be subject to disclosure by the commissioner to persons outside of the department except as agreed to by the small employer carrier or as ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 58, § 1; 1993, ch. 83, § 1; 2003, ch. 159, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(ii), inserted “percent” following “more than thirty-five.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

26-19-301

.

§ 26-19-305.
Renewability of coverage.

A health benefit plan subject to this act shall be renewable with respect to all eligible employees or dependents at the option of the employer except in the following cases:

Nonpayment of the required premiums;

Fraud or misrepresentation of the employer or, with respect to coverage of individual insureds, the insureds or their representatives;

Noncompliance with the carrier’s minimum participation requirements;

Noncompliance with the carrier’s employer contribution requirements;

Repeated misuse of a provider network provision;

The carrier elects not to renew all of its health benefit plans issued to small employers in this state. In such a case, the carrier shall:

Provide advanced notice of its decision under this paragraph to the commissioner in each state in which it is licensed; and

Provide notice of the decision not to renew coverage to all affected health benefit plans and to the commissioner in each state in which an affected insured individual is known to reside at least one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the nonrenewal of any health benefit plans by the carrier. Notice to the commissioner under this subparagraph shall be provided at least three (3) working days prior to the notice to the affected health plans.

The commissioner finds that the continuation of the coverage would:

Not be in the best interests of the policyholders or certificate holders; or

Impair the carrier’s ability to meet its contractual obligations.

If the commissioner finds that the carrier may elect not to renew coverage under paragraph (vii) of subsection (a) of this section he shall assist affected small employers in finding replacement coverage.

A carrier that elects not to renew a health benefit plan under paragraph (vi) of subsection (a) of this section shall be prohibited from writing new business in the small employer market for a period of five (5) years from the date of notice to the commissioner.

In the case of a health maintenance organization doing business in the small employer market in one (1) established geographic service area of the state, the provisions set forth in this section shall apply to the health maintenance organization’s operations in that service area.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 58, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

26-19-301

.

§ 26-19-306.
Availability of coverage.

Within one hundred eighty (180) days after the commissioner’s approval of the basic health benefit plan and the standard health benefit plan developed pursuant to W.S.

26-19-308

, but in no case prior to March 31, 1993, every small employer carrier shall, as a condition of transacting business in this state with small employers, actively offer to small employers all health benefit plans which it actively markets to small employers in this state, including at least two (2) health benefit plans. One (1) plan to be offered by each small employer carrier shall be a basic health benefit plan and one (1) plan shall be a standard health benefit plan. Except as provided in this section, all small employer carriers shall issue any health benefit plan to any eligible small employer that applies for the plan and agrees to make the required premium payments and to satisfy the other reasonable provisions of the plan. Carriers or multiple employer welfare associations whose bylaws or charters do not permit them to issue coverage on a marketwide basis shall only be required to guarantee issue to those small employers which meet the requirements of the bylaws or charters. Charter or bylaw provisions which prohibit issuance to specific populations based on health status or health risk shall not be considered as exceptions to the requirements of this subsection.

A small employer carrier shall file with the commissioner, in a format and manner prescribed by the commissioner, the basic health benefit plan and the standard health benefit plan to be used by the carrier. A plan filed pursuant to this section may be used by a small employer carrier beginning forty-five (45) days after it is filed unless the commissioner disapproves its use. The commissioner at any time may, after providing notice and an opportunity for a hearing to the small employer carrier, disapprove the continued use by a small employer carrier of a basic or standard health benefit plan on the grounds that the plan does not meet the requirements of this section.

All health benefit plans covering small employers shall comply with the following provisions:

Preexisting condition provisions shall not exclude coverage for a period beyond twelve (12) months following the individual’s effective date of coverage and shall only relate to conditions for which medical advice, diagnosis, care or treatment was recommended or received during the six (6) months immediately preceding the effective date of coverage. Pregnancy shall not be treated as a preexisting condition. Genetic information shall not be treated as a preexisting condition in the absence of a diagnosis of a condition related to such information;

In determining whether a preexisting condition provision applies to an eligible employee or dependent, all health benefit plans shall credit the time the person was previously covered by public or private health insurance or other health benefit arrangement if the previous coverage was continuous to a date not more than ninety (90) days prior to the effective date of the new coverage, exclusive of any applicable waiting period under such plan;

Late enrollees may be excluded from coverage for the greater of eighteen (18) months or an eighteen (18) month preexisting condition exclusion, provided that if both a period of exclusion from coverage and a preexisting condition exclusion are applicable to a late enrollee, the combined period shall not exceed eighteen (18) months;

Any requirement used by a small employer carrier in determining whether to provide coverage to a small employer group, including requirements for minimum participation of eligible employees and minimum employer contributions, shall be applied uniformly among all small employer groups with the same number of eligible employees applying for coverage or receiving coverage from the small employer carrier. A small employer carrier may vary application of minimum participation requirements and minimum employer contribution requirements only by the size of the small employer group;

In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to a small employer, a small employer carrier shall not consider employees or dependents who are otherwise covered by a public or an employment based health benefit plan in determining whether the applicable percentage of participation is met;

If a small employer carrier offers coverage to a small employer, it shall offer coverage to all of the small employer’s eligible employees and may offer coverage to their dependents. A small employer carrier shall not offer coverage to only certain persons in a group or to only part of a group, except in the case of late enrollees as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection. Except as permitted under paragraphs (i) and (iii) of this subsection, a small employer carrier shall not modify a health benefit plan with respect to a small employer or any eligible employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude coverage or benefits for specified diseases, medical conditions or services otherwise covered by the plan;

In the case of a group health plan that offers medical care through health insurance coverage offered by a health maintenance organization, the plan may provide for an affiliation period with respect to coverage through the health maintenance organization only if:

No preexisting condition exclusion is imposed with respect to such coverage;

The affiliation period is applied uniformly without regard to any health status related factors; and

The affiliation period does not exceed two (2) months, or three (3) months in the case of a late enrollee.

No small employer carrier shall be required to offer coverage or accept applications pursuant to subsection (a) of this section in the case of the following:

To a small employer, where the small employer is not physically located in the small employer carrier’s established geographic service area;

To an employer whose employees do not work or reside within the small employer carrier’s established geographic service area; or

Within an area where the small employer carrier reasonably anticipates, and demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioner, that it will not have the capacity within its established geographic service area to deliver service adequately to the members of such groups because of its obligations to existing group contract holders and enrollees.

A small employer carrier that cannot offer coverage pursuant to paragraph (d)(iii) of this section shall not offer coverage in the applicable area to new cases of employer groups with more than fifty (50) eligible employees or small employer groups until the later of one hundred eighty (180) days following each such refusal or the date on which the carrier notifies the commissioner that it has regained capacity to deliver services to small employer groups.

If any carrier has insured a disproportionate number of small employer groups with employees requiring reinsurance, the carrier may petition the commissioner to temporarily suspend the requirement to accept every small employer applying for coverage. The suspension may be granted only if the commissioner finds:

The carrier is reasonably reinsuring lives at a rate of at least one hundred thirty percent (130%) of the statewide average for reinsurance; and

The rate of reinsurance is having a significant disproportional adverse effect on the carrier that is impairing its ability to offer policies at competitive rates in the small group market.

A small employer carrier shall not be required to offer coverage or accept applications pursuant to subsection (a) of this section for so long as the commissioner finds that the acceptance of an application or applications would place the small employer carrier in a financially impaired condition.

The requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to any carrier which maintains existing health benefit plans covering eligible employees of one (1) or more small employers but is no longer enrolling new small employers.

In addition to the prohibition on the use of genetic testing information provided in paragraph (c)(i) of this section, all health benefit plans covering small employers shall not, based on the genetic testing information of an individual or a family member of an individual:

Establish rules of eligibility to enroll in the plan;

Deny eligibility;

Adjust premium rates;

Adjust contribution rates;

Request or require predictive genetic testing information concerning an individual or a family member of the individual, except the health benefit plan may only request, but not require, predictive genetic testing information if needed for diagnosis, treatment or payment. As part of a request under this paragraph, the plan or issuer shall provide a description of the procedures in place to safeguard confidentiality of the information.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 58, § 1; 1993, ch. 83, § 1; 1995, ch. 93, § 2; 1997, ch. 120, § 1; 2003, ch. 74, § 1; 2015 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015,
in (c)(vi), added “may offer coverage to” following
“employees and” in the first sentence.

Cross references. —

For provisions pertaining to genetic testing, see §

14-2-701

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

The propriety, under ERISA (29 USC §§ 1001 et seq.) and the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 USC §§ 12101 et seq.) of capping health insurance coverage for HIV-related claims, 131 ALR Fed 191.